Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-2217.03
Signature, defined.

Signature means
personalized evidence indicating authentication of the work performed by the
real property appraiser and the acceptance of the responsibility for content,
analyses, and the conclusions in a report.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 11.